Yamls-norm/N-kanj_gt-norm.yaml
     кань+N+Pl+Abl: каньяслысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: каньяснымлысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: каньясныдлысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: каньясныслысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: каньясӧйлысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: каньясыдлысь
     кань+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: каньясыслысь
#     кань+N+Pl+Acc: [каньяс, каньясӧс]
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: каньяснымӧс
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: каньяснытӧ
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: каньяснысӧ
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: каньясӧс
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: каньястӧ
     кань+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: каньяссӧ
     кань+N+Pl+Apr: каньяслань
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [каньясланьным, каньяснымлань]
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [каньясланьныд, каньясныдлань]
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [каньясланьныс, каньясныслань]
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [каньясланьым, каньясӧйлань]
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: каньясланьыд
     кань+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: каньясланьыс
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr: каньясланьсянь
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: каньясланьсяньным
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: каньясланьсяньныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: каньясланьсяньныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: каньясӧйланьсянь
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: каньясланьсяньыд
     кань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: каньясланьсяньыс
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla: каньясланьысь
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: каньясланьсьыным
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: каньясланьсьыныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: каньясланьсьыныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: каньясланьсьым
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: каньясланьсьыд
     кань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: каньясланьсьыс
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll: каньясланьӧ
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: каньясланяным
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: каньясланяныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: каньясланяныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: каньясланям
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: каньясланяд
     кань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: каньясланяс
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne: каньясланьын
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: каньясланяным
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: каньясланяныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: каньясланяныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: каньясланям
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: каньясланяд
     кань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: каньясланяс
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl: каньясланьӧд
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: каньясланьӧдным
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: каньясланьӧдныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: каньясланьӧдныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: каньясланьӧдым
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: каньясланьӧдыд
     кань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: каньясланьӧдыс
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer: каньясланьӧдз
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl1: каньясланьӧдзным
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl2: каньясланьӧдзныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl3: каньясланьӧдзныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg1: каньясланьӧдзым
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg2: каньясланьӧдзыд
     кань+N+Pl+AprTer+PxSg3: каньясланьӧдзыc
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra: каньясланьті
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl1: каньясланьтіным
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl2: каньясланьтіныд
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl3: каньясланьтіныс
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg1: каньясланьтіым
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg2: каньясланьтіыд
     кань+N+Pl+AprTra+PxSg3: каньясланьтіыс
     кань+N+Pl+Car: каньястӧг
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: *каньяснымтӧг, каньястӧгным]
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: каньястӧгныд
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: каньястӧгныс
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxSg1: каньясӧйтӧг
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [каньястӧгыд, каньясыдтӧг]
     кань+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: каньястӧгыс
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr: каньясся
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: каньяссяным
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: каньяссяныд
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: каньяссяныс
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: каньясӧйся
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: каньяссяыд
     кань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: каньяссяыс
     кань+N+Pl+Cns: каньясла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: каньяснымла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: каньясныдла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: каньяснысла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: каньясӧйла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: каньясыдла
     кань+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: каньясысла
     кань+N+Pl+Com: каньяскӧд
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: [каньяскӧдным, каньяснымкӧд]
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: [каньяскӧдныд, каньясныдкӧд]
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: [каньяскӧдныс, каньясныскӧд]
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [каньясӧйкӧд
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [каньяскӧдыд, каньясыдкӧд]
     кань+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [каньяскӧдыс, каньясыскӧд]
     кань+N+Pl+Dat: каньяслы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: каньяснымлы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: каньясныдлы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: каньясныслы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: каньясӧйлы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: каньясыдлы
     кань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: каньясыслы
     кань+N+Pl+Egr: каньяссянь
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [каньяснымсянь, каньяссяньным]
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [каньясныдсянь, каньяссяньныд]
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [каньясныссянь, каньяссяньныс]
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [каньяссаньым, каньясӧйсянь]
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [каньяссяньыд, каньясыдсянь]
     кань+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: каньяссяньыс
     кань+N+Pl+Ela: каньясысь
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: каньяссьыным
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: каньяссьыныд
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: каньяссьыныс
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: каньяссьым
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: каньяссьыд
     кань+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: каньяссьыс
     кань+N+Pl+Gen: каньяслӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: каньяснымлӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: каньясныдлӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: каньясныслӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: каньясӧйлӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: каньясыдлӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: каньясыслӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Ill: каньясӧ
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: каньясаным
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: каньясаныд
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: каньясаныс
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: каньясам
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: каньясад
     кань+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: каньясас
     кань+N+Pl+Ine: каньясын
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: каньясаным
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: каньясаныд
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: каньясаныс
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: каньясам
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: каньясад
     кань+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: каньясас
     кань+N+Pl+Ins: каньясӧн
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: каньяснаным
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: каньяснаныд
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: каньяснаныс
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: каньяснам
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: каньяснад
     кань+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: каньяснас
     кань+N+Pl+Nom: каньяс
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: каньясным
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: каньясныд
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: каньясныс
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: каньясӧй
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: каньясыд
     кань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: каньясыс
     кань+N+Pl+Prl: каньясӧд
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [каньяснымӧд, каньясӧдным]
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: каньясӧдныд
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: каньясӧдныс
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: каньясӧдым
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: каньясӧдыд
     кань+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: каньясӧдыс
     кань+N+Pl+Ter: каньясӧдз
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: каньясӧдзным
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: каньясӧдзныд
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: каньясӧдзныс
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: каньясӧдзым
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: каньясӧдзыд
     кань+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: каньясӧдзыс
     кань+N+Pl+Tra: каньясті
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: каньястіным
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: каньястіныд
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: каньястіныс
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg1: каньястіым
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: каньястіыд
     кань+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: каньястіыс
     кань+N+Sg+Abl: каньлысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: каньнымлысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: каньныдлысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: каньныслысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: каньӧйлысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: каньыдлысь
     кань+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: каньыслысь
#     кань+N+Sg+Acc: [кань, каньӧс]
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: каньнымӧс
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: каньнытӧ
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: каньнысӧ
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: каньӧс
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: каньтӧ
     кань+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: каньсӧ
     кань+N+Sg+Apr: каньлань
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [каньланьным, каньнымлань]
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [каньланьныд, каньныдлань]
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [каньланьныс, каньныслань]
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [каньланьым, каньӧйлань]
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: каньланьыд
     кань+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: каньланьыс
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr: каньланьсянь
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: каньланьсяньным
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: каньланьсяньныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: каньланьсяньныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: каньӧйланьсянь
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: каньланьсяньыд
     кань+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: каньланьсяньыс
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla: каньланьысь
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: каньланьсьыным
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: каньланьсьыныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: каньланьсьыныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: каньланьсьым
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: каньланьсьыд
     кань+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: каньланьсьыс
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll: каньланьӧ
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: каньланяным
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: каньланяныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: каньланяныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: каньланям
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: каньланяд
     кань+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: каньланяс
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne: каньланьын
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: каньланяным
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: каньланяныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: каньланяныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: каньланям
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: каньланяд
     кань+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: каньланяс
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl: каньланьӧд
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: каньланьӧдным
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: каньланьӧдныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: каньланьӧдныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: каньланьӧдым
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: каньланьӧдыд
     кань+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: каньланьӧдыс
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer: каньланьӧдз
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl1: каньланьӧдзным
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl2: каньланьӧдзныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxPl3: каньланьӧдзныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg1: каньланьӧдзым
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg2: каньланьӧдзыд
     кань+N+Sg+AprTer+PxSg3: каньланьӧдзыc
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra: каньланьті
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl1: каньланьтіным
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl2: каньланьтіныд
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxPl3: каньланьтіныс
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg1: каньланьтіым
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg2: каньланьтіыд
     кань+N+Sg+AprTra+PxSg3: каньланьтіыс
     кань+N+Sg+Car: каньтӧг
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [каньнымтӧг, каньтӧгным]
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: каньтӧгныд
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: каньтӧгныс
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxSg1: каньӧйтӧг
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [каньтӧгыд, каньыдтӧг]
     кань+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: каньтӧгыс
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr: канься
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: каньсяным
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: каньсяныд
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: каньсяныс
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: каньӧйся
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: каньсяыд
     кань+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: каньсяыс
     кань+N+Sg+Cns: каньла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: каньнымла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: каньныдла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: каньнысла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: каньӧйла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: каньыдла
     кань+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: каньысла
     кань+N+Sg+Com: канькӧд
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: [канькӧдным, каньнымкӧд]
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: [канькӧдныд, каньныдкӧд]
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: [канькӧдныс, каньныскӧд]
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: каньӧйкӧд
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: [канькӧдыд, каньыдкӧд]
     кань+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: [канькӧдыс, каньыскӧд]
     кань+N+Sg+Dat: каньлы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: каньнымлы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: каньныдлы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: каньныслы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: каньӧйлы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: каньыдлы
     кань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: каньыслы
     кань+N+Sg+Egr: каньсянь
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [каньнымсянь, каньсяньным]
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [каньныдсянь, каньсяньныд]
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [каньныссянь, каньсяньныс]
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [каньсаньым, каньӧйсянь]
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [каньсяньыд, каньыдсянь]
     кань+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: каньсяньыс
     кань+N+Sg+Ela: каньысь
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: каньсьыным
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: каньсьыныд
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: каньсьыныс
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: каньсьым
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: каньсьыд
     кань+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: каньсьыс
     кань+N+Sg+Gen: каньлӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: каньнымлӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: каньныдлӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: каньныслӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: каньӧйлӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: каньыдлӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: каньыслӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Ill: каньӧ
